Mississippi, session 2026, HB1243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 29-7-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-7-3.  There shall be no development or extraction of oil, gas, or other minerals from state-owned lands by any private party without first obtaining a mineral lease therefor from the commission.  The commission is hereby authorized and empowered, for and on behalf of the state, to lease any and all of the state land now owned (including that submerged or whereover the tide may ebb and flow) or hereafter acquired, to some reputable person, association, or company for oil and/or gas and/or other minerals in and under and which may be produced therefrom, excepting, however, sixteenth section school land, lieu lands, and such forfeited tax land and property the title to which is subject to any lawful redemption, for such consideration and upon such terms and conditions as the commission deems just and proper.  No mineral lease of offshore lands shall allow offshore drilling operations north of the coastal barrier islands, except in Blocks 40, 41, 42, 43, 63, 64 and 66 through 98, inclusive.  Further, surface offshore drilling operations will not be allowed within one (1) mile of Cat Island.  The commission may only offer for lease the state-owned lands in Blocks 40, 41, 42, 43, 63, 64 and 66 through 98, inclusive, as shown on the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality Bureau of Geology Plat of Lease Blocks (Open File Report 151) on terms and conditions and for a length of time as determined by the commission.  The commission may not lease any lands or submerged lands off the Mississippi Gulf Coast that have been leased by the Department of Marine Resources before January 1, 2004, for any public or private oyster reef lease or any lands or submerged lands within one (1) mile of that lease for the purposes of drilling offshore for oil, gas and other minerals. Consistent with the conservation policies of this state under Section 53-1-1 et seq., the commission may offer for public bid any tracts or blocks of state-owned lands not currently under lease, which have been identified to the commission as having development potential for oil or natural gas, not less than once a year.  Upon consultation with the Office of Geology in the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality, the Secretary of State and any other state agency as the commission deems appropriate, the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with this chapter governing all aspects of the process of leasing state lands within its jurisdiction for mineral development, including the setting of all terms of the lease form to be used for leasing state-owned lands, any necessary fees, public bidding process, delay rental payments, shut-in royalty payments, and such other provisions as may be required.  The Attorney General shall review the lease form adopted by the commission for legal sufficiency. There shall not be conducted any seismographic or other mineral exploration or testing activities on any state-owned lands within the mineral leasing jurisdiction of the commission without first obtaining a permit therefor from the commission.  Upon consultation with the Office of Geology in the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality, the Secretary of State and any other state agency as the commission deems appropriate, the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations governing all aspects of seismographic or other mineral exploration activity on state lands within its jurisdiction, including the establishing of fees and issuance of permits for the conduct of such mineral exploration activities.  The Attorney General shall review the permit form adopted by the commission for legal sufficiency.  Provided, however, that persons obtaining permits from the commission for seismographic or other mineral exploration or testing activities on state-owned wildlife management areas, lakes and fish hatcheries, shall be subject to rules and regulations promulgated therefor by the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks which shall also receive all permit fees for such testing on said lands.  In addition, persons obtaining permits from the commission for seismographic or other mineral exploration or testing activities on state-owned marine waters shall be subject to rules and regulations promulgated therefor by the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources which shall also receive all permit fees for such testing on those waters. Further, provided that each permit within the Mississippi Sound or tidelands shall be reviewed by the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources and such special conditions as it may specify will be included in the permit.  Information or data obtained in any mineral exploration activity on any and all state lands shall be disclosed to the state through the commission, upon demand.  Such information or data shall be treated as confidential for a period of ten (10) years from the date of receipt thereof and shall not be disclosed to the public or to any firm, individual or agency other than officials or authorized employees of this state.  Any person who makes unauthorized disclosure of such confidential information or data shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisoned in the county jail not more than one (1) year, or both. Whenever any such land or property is leased for oil and gas and/or other minerals, such lease contract shall provide for a lease royalty to the state of at least three-sixteenths (3/16) of such oil and gas or other minerals, same to be paid in the manner prescribed by the commission.  Of the monies received in connection with the execution of such leases, five-tenths of one percent (5/10 of 1%) shall be retained in a special fund to be appropriated by the Legislature, One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) of which amount to be used by the commission for the administration of the leasing and permitting under this section, and the remainder of such amount shall be deposited into the Education Trust Fund, created in Section 206A, Mississippi Constitution of 1890; and two percent (2%) shall be paid into a special fund to be designated as the "Gulf and Wildlife Protection Fund," to be appropriated by the Legislature, one-half (1/2) thereof to be apportioned as follows:  an amount which shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be used by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources solely for the purpose of cleanup, remedial or abatement actions involving pollution as a result of the exploration or production of oil or gas, and any amount in excess of such One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Education Trust Fund, created in Section 206A, Mississippi Constitution of 1890.  The remaining one-half (1/2) of such Gulf and Wildlife Protection Fund to be apportioned as follows:  an amount which shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be used by the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources for use first in the prudent management, preservation, protection and conservation of existing waters, lands and wildlife of this state and then, provided such purposes are accomplished, for the acquisition of additional waters and lands and any amount in excess of such One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Education Trust Fund, created in Section 206A, Mississippi Constitution of 1890.  However, in the event that the Legislature is not in session to appropriate funds from the Gulf and Wildlife Protection Fund for the purpose of cleanup, remedial or abatement actions involving pollution as a result of the exploration or production of oil or gas, then the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources may make expenditures from this special fund account solely for said purpose.  The commission may lease the submerged beds for sand and gravel on such a basis as it may deem proper, but where the waters lie between this state and an adjoining state, there must be a cash realization to this state, including taxes paid for such sand and gravel, equal to that being had by such adjoining state, in all cases the requisite consents therefor being lawfully obtained from the United States. The Department of Environmental Quality is authorized to employ competent engineering personnel to survey the territorial waters of this state in the Mississippi Sound and the Gulf of Mexico and to prepare a map or plat of such territorial waters, divided into blocks of not more than six thousand (6,000) acres each with coordinates and reference points based upon longitude and latitude surveys.  The commission is authorized to adopt such survey, plat or map for leasing of such submerged lands for mineral development; and such leases may, after the adoption of such plat or map, be made by reference to the map or plat, which shall be on permanent file with the commission and a copy thereof on file in the Office of the State Oil and Gas Board. SECTION 2.  Section 49-15-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-3.  As used in this chapter, the term: (a) "Commission" means the Mississippi Advisory Commission on Marine Resources. (b) "Department" means the Department of Marine Resources. (c) "Domicile" means a person's principal or primary place of abode in which a person's habitation is fixed and to which the person, whenever absent, has the present intention of returning after a departure of absence therefrom, regardless of the duration of the absence.  The burden of proving domicile in the State of Mississippi shall be on the person claiming that status.  A person holding a current driver's license shall be deemed to be domiciled within the state issuing the license.  If a person does not hold a current driver's license the following evidence may be considered in establishing, but is not necessarily determinative of domicile:  residence for income or other tax purposes, homestead exemption receipt or other means prescribed by the department.  In the case of minors, domicile of the parents shall be used as evidence of the minor's domicile. (d)  "Game fish" means cobia, also known as ling or lemonfish (rachycentron canadum).  The cobia is classified as game fish. (e)  "Illegal oysters" means: (i)  All untagged shell stock; (ii)  Shell oysters obtained from uncertified shops or dealers or from an unlicensed catcher; (iii)  Oysters obtained from waters not declared safe and sanitary by the department, except those oysters caught by the department for re-laying or under private leases pursuant to Section 49-15-27; (iv)  Shucked oysters obtained from uncertified shops or repackers. (f) "Inspector" means the chief inspector, the assistant chief inspector, deputy inspector, bureau director and certified enforcement officer employed by the department. (g)  "Natural reefs" means any bottom under the jurisdiction of the department of one or more acres on which oysters grow naturally, or have grown naturally, in a quantity sufficient to warrant commercial fishing as a means of livelihood, or have been used in such a manner within a period of ten (10) years next preceding the time the bottoms may come up for determination by the department. (h)  "Resident" means a person, firm or corporation that is domiciled in this state. (i) "Seafood" means all oysters, saltwater fish, saltwater shrimp, diamondback terrapin, sea turtle, crabs and all other species of marine or saltwater animal life existing or living in the waters within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 3.  Section 49-15-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-5.  All seafoods existing or living in waters within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi not held in private ownership legally acquired, and all beds and bottoms of rivers, streams, bayous, lagoons, lakes, bays, sounds and inlets bordering on or connecting with the Gulf of Mexico or Mississippi Sound within such territorial jurisdiction, including all oysters and other shell fish and parts thereof grown thereon, either naturally or cultivated, shall be, continue, and remain the property of the State of Mississippi, to be held in trust for the people thereof until title thereto shall be legally divested in the manner and form hereinafter authorized, and the same shall be under the exclusive control of the department until the right of private ownership shall vest therein as hereinafter provided. SECTION 4.  Section 49-15-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-7.  All shells of dead oysters, clams and other shellfish; and all of the oyster shells, clam shells, mussel shells, dead reef shells, and cay shells, being upon or under the bottom of, or under the tidewaters within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi, and all beds, banks and accumulations of such shells within such territorial jurisdiction on or under the bottoms of such waters, or surrounded by such waters, being the property of the State of Mississippi are hereby further declared to be the property of the State of Mississippi under the jurisdiction of the department. SECTION 5.  Section 49-15-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-9.  The sole right of planting, cultivating in racks or other structures, and gathering oysters and erecting bathhouses and other structures in front of any land bordering on the Gulf of Mexico or Mississippi Sound or waters tributary thereto belongs to the riparian owner and extends not more than seven hundred fifty (750) yards from the shore, except for state-owned lands on Deer Island, which shall be not more than four hundred (400) yards from shore, measuring from the average low water mark, and except for state-owned lands along the Hancock County shoreline from Bayou Caddy to the Mississippi-Louisiana state boundary, which shall not extend out further than three hundred (300) yards from the average low watermark, but where the distance from shore to shore is less than fifteen hundred (1500) yards, the owners of either shore may plant and gather to a line equidistant between the two (2) shores, but no person shall plant in any natural channel so as to interfere with navigation, and such riparian rights shall not include any reef or natural oyster bed and does not extend beyond any channel.  A riparian owner shall comply with the Coastal Wetlands Protection Act in exercising the use of these riparian rights.  Stakes of such frail materials as will not injure any watercraft may be set up to designate the bounds of the plantation, but navigation shall not be impeded thereby.  The riparian owner shall clearly mark such cultivation racks and other structures.  The department may adopt regulations to require that the racks are adequately marked to ensure the safety of users of public waters.  Any oysters planted by such riparian owner are the private property of such riparian owner, subject to the right of the department to adopt reasonable rules and regulations as to the planting and gathering of such oysters.  All bathhouses, piers, wharfs, docks and pavilions, or other structures owned by the riparian owner are likewise the private property of such owner, who shall be entitled to the exclusive use, occupancy and possession thereof, and may abate any private or public nuisance committed by any person or persons in the area of his riparian ownership and may, for such purposes, resort to any remedial action authorized by law.  The governing authorities of any municipality and the board of supervisors of any county are authorized to adopt reasonable rules and regulations to protect riparian owners in the enjoyment of their riparian rights, and for such purposes may regulate the use of beaches, landings, and riparian areas abutting or fronting on roads, streets or highways. SECTION 6.  Section 49-15-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-15.  (1)  In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the department, with the advice of the advisory commission, shall have the following powers and duties regarding the regulation of seafood: (a)  To exercise full jurisdiction and authority over all marine aquatic life and to regulate any matters pertaining to seafood, including cultivated seafood; (b)  To adopt, promulgate, amend or repeal, after due notice and public hearing, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law and subject to the limitations in subsection (2) of this section, rules and regulations authorized under this chapter, including, but not limited to, rules and regulations necessary for the protection, conservation or propagation of all seafood in the waters under the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi and for the regulation of gill net and purse seine fishermen.  All public hearings under this chapter concerning the regulation of marine resources shall be held in Hancock, Harrison or Jackson Counties.  Each rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter shall immediately be advertised one (1) time in a newspaper or newspapers having general circulation in counties affected by that regulation.  A regulation shall become effective at 6:00 a.m. on the day after its publication; (c)  To regulate all seafood sanitation and processing programs.  In the three (3) coastal counties, the sanitation program regulating processing plants and seafood sold in retail stores operating in conjunction with a processing plant or seafood market that primarily deals with seafood is under the exclusive authority of the department.  The department may also inspect and regulate those areas of any seafood processing plant which process freshwater species at any site.  To effectively and efficiently implement the state seafood sanitation program, the State Health Officer, the Commissioner of Agriculture and the executive director of the department may enter into a memorandum of understanding, which at a minimum, clearly specifies the responsibilities of each agency in implementing the seafood sanitation program, as well as the sharing of information and communication and coordination between the agencies; (d)  To set standards of measure; (e)  To set requirements for employment of commission employees whose compensation shall be governed by the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board; (f)  To acquire and dispose of commission equipment and facilities; (g)  To keep proper records of the commission, including an official ordinance book which contains all rules and regulations promulgated by the department, with the advice of the advisory commission, under this chapter; (h)  To enter into advantageous interstate and intrastate agreements with proper officials, which directly or indirectly result in the protection, propagation and conservation of the seafood of the State of Mississippi, or continue any such agreements now in existence; (i)  To arrange, negotiate or contract for the use of available federal, state and local facilities which would aid in the propagation, protection and conservation of the seafood of the State of Mississippi; (j)  To authorize the operation of double rigs in the waters lying between the mainland coast and the island chain, and those rigs shall not exceed a length of twenty-five (25) feet at the corkline, and to prescribe the length at the lead line for each rig, net or try-trawl; (k)  To destroy or dispose of equipment or nets which have been lawfully seized by the commission and which are not sold under Section 49-15-201 et seq.; (l)  To open, close and regulate fishing seasons for the taking of shrimp, oysters, fish taken for commercial purposes and crabs and set size, catching and taking regulations for all types of seafood and culling regulations for oysters, except as otherwise specifically provided by law; (m)  To utilize the resources of the Gulf Coast Research Laboratory to the fullest extent possible; (n)  To develop a resource management plan to preserve seafood resources and to ensure a safe supply of these resources; (o)  To prescribe types and forms of scientific permits for public educational or scientific institutions, federal and state agencies and consultants performing marine resource studies; (p)  To suspend the issuance of licenses when necessary to impose a moratorium to conserve a fishery resource; (q)  To promote, construct, monitor and maintain artificial fishing reefs in the marine waters of the State of Mississippi and in adjacent federal waters; to accept grants and donations of money or materials from public and private sources for such reefs; to set permit fees and establish guidelines for the construction of artificial reefs in federal waters; and to apply for any federal permits necessary for the construction or maintenance of artificial fishing reefs in federal waters.  The location data associated with artificial reefs by corporations and private individuals shall not be published by the commission or the department on the website or in written publications of the department. Location data of the artificial reefs may be requested in writing by any individual and shall be provided by the department in a timely manner; and (r)  To require, in addition to other licensing requirements, the successful completion of educational or training programs on shellfish sanitation as a prerequisite to receiving commercial licenses authorized under this chapter in order to ensure compliance with the Interstate Shellfish Sanitation Conference's educational requirements for shellfish processors, dealers and harvesters by January 1, 2014. (2)  The department shall not adopt rules, regulations or ordinances pertaining to marine resources which are more stringent than federal regulations.  In any case where federal laws and regulations are silent on a matter pertaining to marine resources, the laws and regulations of the State of Mississippi shall control.  The department shall review all marine resource ordinances for compliance with the no more stringent standard and revise any ordinances more stringent than this standard no later than December 31, 1992.  This subsection shall not apply to rules, regulations or ordinances pertaining to the wild stock of marine fin fish. SECTION 7.  Section 49-15-16, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-16.  The department may develop a limited entry fisheries management program for all resource groups.  The department may require a license for each resource group and shall establish the fees for such licenses.  The department may establish a means test or any other criteria to determine eligibility for licenses under the limited entry program.  The department may impose a moratorium on the issuance of licenses for a fishery resource. SECTION 8.  Section 49-15-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-17.  (1)  (a)  All monies received or obtained by the department under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid over by the department to the State Treasurer and shall be deposited into the fund known as the "Seafood Fund."  All revenues collected through the department, to include, but not limited to, commercial saltwater licenses and taxes, permits, fines and penalties, and confiscated catches, shall be deposited into the department operating account (Seafood Fund) and expended for the operation of the department, as authorized by the Legislature. (b)  There is established a special account to be known as the "Artificial Reef Program Account" within the Seafood Fund.  Any funds received from any public or private source for the purpose of promoting, constructing, monitoring or maintaining artificial reefs in the marine waters of the state or in federal waters adjacent to the marine waters of the state shall be credited to the account.  Any unexpended funds remaining in the account at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the Seafood Fund, but shall remain in the account.  The department may expend any funds in the account, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, to accomplish the purpose of the account. (c)  There is established a special account to be known as the "Coastal Preserve Account" within the Seafood Fund.  Any funds received from any public or private source for the purpose of management, improvement and acquisition of coastal preserves in the state and money required to be deposited pursuant to Sections 27-19-56.10 and 27-19-56.27, shall be credited to the account.  Any unexpended funds remaining in the account at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the Seafood Fund, but shall remain in the account.  The department may expend any funds in the account, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, for the management, improvement and acquisition of coastal preserves. (d)  There is established a special account to be known as the "Mississippi Seafood Marketing Program Account" within the Seafood Fund.  Monies required to be deposited into the account under Section 27-19-56.27 and any funds received from any public or private source for the purpose of promoting the Mississippi seafood industry must be credited to the account.  Any unexpended funds remaining in the account at the end of the fiscal year do not lapse into the Seafood Fund, but remain in the account.  The department may expend any funds in the account, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, to accomplish the purposes of this account, including, but not limited to, providing funds for cobia stock enhancement programs. (e)  There is established a special account to be known as the "Oyster Production Preserve Account" within the Seafood Fund.  Monies required to be deposited from oyster leasing and licensing payments under Section 49-15-27, sack fees, and any funds received from any public or private source for the purpose of oyster production and propagation in this state, which includes plantings of oysters and cultch materials, shall be credited to the account. Any unexpended funds remaining in the account at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the Seafood Fund, but shall remain in the account.  The department may expend any funds in the account, subject to specific appropriation by the Legislature, for the management, improvement and acquisition of permittable property for oyster production and propagation in the state, which includes plantings of oysters and cultch materials.  The Department of Marine Resources shall develop an annual report to the Legislature which describes the annual expenditures from this fund for the purpose of furthering oyster production and propagation in this state to be included in the department's annual budget request to the Legislative Budget Office and to be transmitted to the Chairmen of the Senate and House Committees on Ports and Marine Resources. (2)  The fund shall be treated as a special trust fund and interest earned on the principal shall be credited to the fund. (3)  The department shall keep accurate reports of monies handled as a part of the permanent records of the department, and the State Treasurer shall furnish the department such forms as may be needed, and the department shall account for such forms in reports to the Treasurer. SECTION 9.  Section 49-15-18, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-18.  The executive director of the department shall publish an abstract copy of this chapter and all subsequent amendments to this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated by the department under this chapter.  The department may distribute the publication to all persons requesting a copy and to each licensee at the time of issuance of the license.  New regulations and amendments to this chapter may be supplied to each licensee within a reasonable time after their promulgation or passage.  The department may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed actual cost for its publications. SECTION 10.  Section 49-15-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-23.  (1)  (a)  The Mississippi Department of Marine Resources and the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks are hereby authorized and empowered to establish the dividing line between salt and fresh waters, and when such line has been established and notice thereof given as provided herein, it shall be recognized in the courts in connection with any proceedings under the game and fish laws of this state.  Such line may be changed from time to time by the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources and the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks on proper publication of such changes. (b)  In establishing the dividing line between salt and fresh waters, no part of the Bay of St. Louis shall be declared to be fresh water. (c)  In establishing the dividing line between salt and fresh waters, none of the waters within the municipal boundaries of the City of Pascagoula, as they existed on January 1, 1981, shall be declared to be fresh water. (d)  In establishing the dividing line between salt and fresh waters, no part of Bayou Cassotte and its tributaries, Bang Bayou and its tributaries, Bayou Cumbest and its tributaries, Crooked Bayou, Middle Bayou and that part of Heron Bayou with its tributaries which lie in the State of Mississippi shall be declared to be fresh water. (2)  Whenever any dividing line is established or changed as above provided, notice shall be given to the public by publication for three (3) weeks in a newspaper published and having general circulation in the county or counties affected thereby, and a description of the dividing line shall be filed in the office of the chancery clerk of such counties or county. SECTION 11.  Section 49-15-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-27.  The department is hereby granted full and complete authority to lease the bottoms within its jurisdiction upon the following terms and conditions: (1)  All areas within the department's jurisdiction, not designated state-owned reefs by this chapter, including natural reefs and all areas not within the boundaries of riparian property owners may be leased by the department. (2)  All individual lessees shall be residents of the State of Mississippi, or if a firm or corporation, such firm or corporation shall be organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi and owned by a resident of the State of Mississippi. (3)  No individual, corporation, partnership or association may lease less than one (1) acre nor more than two thousand five hundred (2,500) acres total; however, in the case of an individual there shall be counted towards such limitation any lands leased by a corporation, partnership or association in which such individual owns ten percent (10%) or less interest and, in the case of a corporation, partnership or association, there shall be counted toward such limitation any lands leased by an individual stockholder, partner or associate thereof who owns ten percent (10%) or less interest in such corporation, partnership or association. (4)  Individuals, firms or corporations desiring to lease bottoms shall make application to the department in writing, describing the area to be leased.  Applications must include a plat showing the proposed lease area and description of cultch material type and amount to be deployed on the leased area. (5)  (a)  Any person who qualifies and who desires to lease a part of the bottom or bed of any of the waters of this state as provided in this section shall present to the department a written application, and pay an application fee in the amount of Fifty Dollars ($50.00).  This application shall contain the name and address of the applicant and a reasonably definite description of the location and amount of land covered by water desired by the applicant.  The department shall establish a system to determine qualifications of applicants.  The department shall prioritize applications based on the following criteria, each of which shall be weighted equally: (i)  Experience in oyster reef development; (ii)  Experience in oyster cultivation and harvesting; (iii)  Whether lease applicant is registered with the U.S. Food & Drug Administration Interstate Certified Shellfish Shippers List for Mississippi, and the length of time the applicant has been registered; (iv)  Amount of acreage to be leased; and (v)  Evidence of applicant's financial ability to perform cultivation and propagation requirements. The department shall then order an examination to determine whether the water bottoms applied for are leasable. (b)  If the applicant is found to be qualified and the area is found to be leasable, the department shall determine the acreage upon which the rent shall be fixed and enter into a lease with the applicant, who shall pay the prorated annual rent in advance for the remainder of the calendar year.  If the applicant is not eligible for a lease, the department shall issue a written notice declining the application with specific reasons for same. (c)  The department has the authority to lease an area to an applicant who has no experience in oyster cultivation as long as the applicant can demonstrate their financial stability and the area applied for has not been requested by another applicant with demonstrated experience. (d)  The department has the authority to reconfigure the lease areas from that requested by the applicant in the manner that promotes maximum utilization of the state's resources.  In the event the area requested by the applicant has to be reconfigured, the applicant has the right to refuse the reconfigured area and withdraw their application and receive a refund of their application fee. (e)  The department shall require that the bottoms of water areas to be leased be as definable as possible, taking into consideration such factors as the shape of the body of water, permitted areas, and the condition of the bottom as to hardness or softness which would render it desirable or undesirable for the purpose of oyster cultivation. (f)  A lease applicant may withdraw a lease application and receive a full refund from the department of all application fees, by submitting a written request for withdrawal to the department within ninety (90) days after the department received the application. (6)  Such leases shall be for an initial term of fifteen (15) years, with the lessee having the right of first renewal of the lease for an additional fifteen (15) years, and continue to renew at fifteen-year intervals, at the same ground rental rate so long as lessee actively cultivates and gathers oysters, and complies with the provisions of this chapter.  No lease may be transferred without approval by the department of the transfer. (7)  The terms of every lease issued hereunder shall ensure the maximum cultivation and propagation of oysters.  Throughout the term of every lease issued hereunder, each lessee shall add cultch and make other necessary efforts to ensure the maximum cultivation and propagation of oysters.  The department shall promulgate regulations to set forth guidelines for lessees to follow to ensure the maximum cultivation and propagation of oysters under the lease.  The lessee shall submit a written report with supporting documentation to the department of efforts to cultivate and propagate oysters for the previous year.  If the department finds a lessee is not making efforts to cultivate and propagate oysters, and the lessee fails to take remedial steps to address same, such lease shall be subject to termination as provided for hereunder. (8)  The department shall fix a ground rental rate at Three Dollars ($3.00) per acre per year.  The annual rental payments shall be due by December 31 for the next calendar year. (9)  Any lessee who pays the rent on or after the first day of January shall pay the rent due plus an additional ten percent (10%) penalty.  The failure of the lessee to pay the rent punctually on or before the first of each March, ipso facto and without demand or putting in default, terminates and cancels the lease and forfeits to the department all the works, improvements, betterments, and oysters on the leased water bottom.  The department may at once enter on the water bottom and take possession thereof.  Such water bottom shall then be open for lease in accordance with subsections (5) through (8) of this section.  Ten (10) days thereafter the department shall enter the termination, cancellation, and forfeiture on its books and give public notice thereof by publication in one (1) local paper in the county where the formerly leased water bottoms are located.  On or before the first day of each February, the department shall issue a written notice of delinquency by certified mail to each lessee who has not yet paid the rent.  The department shall also publish notice of such delinquency on its website. (10)  The department shall keep an accurate chart of the areas within its jurisdiction and shall mark on such chart those areas which are under lease.  All leases shall be marked by appropriate poles, stakes or buoys of such material as will not injure watercraft, at the expense of the leaseholder.  The department shall keep an accurate book, designated "Mississippi Oyster Farms" which shall contain copies of all leases.  The department shall maintain a map of designated state-owned, leased areas, and areas available for lease on the department's website.  If any lease be cancelled or expire, such fact shall be noted on the face of such lease.  Lessees shall be "oyster farmers" for the purposes of any grants, aid, subsidies or other assistance from the federal government or other governmental or private agencies. (11)  All funds derived from leasing shall be paid into the Seafood Fund under Section 49-15-17, for use by the department to further oyster production in this state, which includes plantings of oysters and cultch materials. (12)  All leases made by the department under the authority of this section shall be subject to the paramount right of the state and any of its political subdivisions authorized by law, to promote and develop ports, harbors, channels, industrial or recreational projects, and all such leases shall contain a provision that in the event such authorized public body shall require the area so leased or any part thereof for such public purposes, that the lease shall be terminated on reasonable notice fixed by the department in such lease.  On the termination of any lease, the lessees shall have the right to remove any oysters within the leased area within such time as may be fixed by the department and in accordance with such reasonable rules and regulations as the department may adopt. Any person convicted of taking oysters from leased land or from waters that are not of a safe sanitary quality without a permit as provided in Section 49-15-37 shall, on the first offense, forfeit all equipment used, exclusive of any boat or boats; and be fined not to exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) or sentenced not to exceed one (1) year in the county jail, or both.  Subsequent convictions shall be punishable by forfeiture of all equipment, including any boat or boats; and a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or not to exceed two (2) years in prison, or both such fine and imprisonment. The department is enjoined to cooperate with the Jackson County Port Authority, the Harrison County Development Commission, the municipal port commission and other port and harbor agencies, so that oyster beds shall not be planted in close proximity to navigable channels.  The department or lessee shall have no right of action as against any such public body for damages accruing to any natural reef or leased reef by any necessary improvement of such channel in the interest of shipping, commerce, navigation or other purpose authorized by law. (13)  A lessee has the exclusive use of the water bottoms leased and all oysters and cultch grown or placed thereon.  However, this exclusive right is subordinate to the rights and responsibilities of the state, any political subdivision of the state, the United States, or any agency or agent thereof, to take action in furtherance of coastal protection, conservation or restoration. (14)  In order to protect the health and safety of the residents of the State of Mississippi, the terms and conditions relating to the leasing of bottoms provided in this section shall be fully applicable to any lease executed by the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources prior to April 17, 2023, and the department shall revise any lease issued prior to April 17, 2023, as necessary in order to comply with the provisions of this section. SECTION 12.  Section 49-15-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-29.  (1)  The department shall assess and collect license fees and taxes as authorized under this chapter. (2)  All commercial licenses provided for under this chapter that relate to seafood shall be purchased from May 1 through April 30 at the fees provided in this chapter.  The licenses shall expire on April 30 following the date of issuance. (3)  When an application for an original or renewal license of any kind authorized by this chapter is received by the department, the department shall determine whether the vessel or related equipment subject to that license is owned and operated in compliance with applicable federal and state laws.  If the department determines that a vessel or its owner is not in compliance with applicable federal and state laws, then no license shall be issued or renewed for the operation of that vessel for a period of one (1) year.  All licenses shall be made available for purchase at any building which is regularly operated by the department on the Mississippi Gulf Coast. (4)  The department may authorize any person, other than a salaried employee of the state to issue any license under this chapter which the department deems appropriate.  The authorized person may collect and retain for issuance of the license the sum of One Dollar ($1.00) in addition to the license fee provided in this chapter. The department shall establish the qualifications of persons authorized to issue licenses under this section and shall also establish the procedure for the issuance of that license by the authorized person and the procedure for collection of license fees by and from the authorized person. (5)  The department may design, establish, and administer a program to provide for the purchase, by electronic means, of any license, permit, registration or reservation issued by the department.  Any actual costs associated to provide these documents electronically may be added to the cost of the electronic program. SECTION 13.  Section 49-15-30, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-30.  (1)  The department may promulgate rules and regulations for nonresident permits in order to promote reciprocal agreements with other states. (2)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 49-15-46, the department shall provide that residents of other states bordering on the Gulf of Mexico who are applicants for a commercial fishing license of any type as provided for in this chapter shall pay the same fee or fees that a resident of this state pays in this state for that license if the respective applicant's domicile state does not charge a greater fee or fees for a Mississippi resident than for a resident of any other state to engage in a like activity in the other state.  If the applicant's domicile state does charge a greater fee or fees for residents of Mississippi than for a resident of the applicant's domicile state, then that applicant shall pay the same fee or fees that the applicant's domicile state charges residents of Mississippi. (3)  The department shall require a nonresident to purchase the same type and number of licenses and pay the same fees that are required of Mississippi residents to engage in like activity in the nonresident's state. (4)  (a)  If an applicant applies for a nonresident commercial fishing license to engage in a certain activity and the applicant's state does not issue a nonresident commercial fishing license for that activity, then the department shall not issue such license to the applicant. (b)  If the applicant's domicile state has additional mandatory licensing requirements, the applicant must meet those requirements before receiving a nonresident commercial fishing license. (5)  Any nonresident who engages in the commercial taking of seafood within the territorial waters of Mississippi without having the required nonresident commercial license is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and shall forfeit any equipment, gear or nets used in the offense. SECTION 14.  Section 49-15-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-31.  (1)  The department may construct, maintain and operate all patrol stations, camps and related facilities as may be deemed necessary by the department. (2)  If a regulatory agency of a foreign state establishes a station or checkpoint through which Mississippi residents must pass for license, permit or catch inspection, or otherwise, the department shall establish similar stations or checkpoints through which residents of the foreign states shall be required to pass. SECTION 15.  Section 49-15-34, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-34.  (1)  The department shall require all boats used under regulation of this chapter which are also used in waters of other states and required by those states to pay licenses or fees for the same purposes as licenses and fees are required under this chapter to purchase a license which reflects that the licensed boats are used inside and outside the territorial waters of Mississippi.  Upon the issuance of that license, the licensed boat, if used exclusively for commercial fishing or charter boats which have been licensed and authorized by the United States Coast Guard under 46 CFR Sections 24-26 and 46 CFR Sections 175-187, shall be deemed to be in the business of interstate transportation, but this shall in no way affect the collection of other licenses and fees by the department which would otherwise be due under this chapter.  The department shall assess and collect an annual license fee of Twenty Dollars ($20.00) on each boat engaged in operations under this subsection. (2)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, the department shall establish a transport permit to land seafood in this state which is legally taken outside of the Mississippi territorial waters without obtaining a license under this chapter.  The department by regulation shall require the registration of those landings.  The department may establish a permit fee in an amount not to exceed the amount of the license fee established in Section 49-15-28(1).  This subsection shall not be construed to supersede Section 49-15-71. SECTION 16.  Section 49-15-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-35.  Upon the request of the boards of supervisors of the respective coastal counties, the department may adopt ordinances prohibiting the taking and catching of menhaden within certain limits of the coast line of the county so requesting, but the department shall not fix such limits except upon request of the board of supervisors, and such limit shall not exceed two (2) miles from the shore line, or two (2) miles from the corporate limit boundaries of any municipality bordering on the Mississippi Sound. SECTION 17.  Section 49-15-36, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-36.  (1)  The Department of Marine Resources shall have full jurisdiction and control of all designated state-owned reefs and oyster bottoms of the State of Mississippi. The department may lease up to eighty percent (80%) of the permitted areas available.  Permitted areas not subject to a lease under this chapter shall remain open to the public. (2)  State-owned reefs may be opened for harvest of oysters during the season on a rotating basis.  If the department determines that a particular reef has been overharvested or that a high percentage of sublegal size oysters exist on a particular reef and that harvest could damage future oyster crops, the department may close designated reef areas and keep them closed during the season. (3)  The department shall promulgate regulations regarding the closing of oyster reefs to protect the public health.  When that testing indicates the oysters on the closed reef are suitable for consumption, the reef shall be opened for the taking of oysters as soon as notice of that opening may be made to interested parties.  The authority to open or close oyster reefs under this chapter shall be solely within the discretion of the department.  The Gulf Coast Research Laboratory or other certified laboratory shall cooperate with the department and shall conduct necessary tests to determine the condition of oyster reefs at the request of the department.  The department may limit the sale of oysters for human consumption. (4)  (a)  The department may issue special permits for the purpose of catching oysters outside the open season or in areas not normally open to harvest to those nonprofit organizations that are tax exempt under Section 501(c) of the United States Internal Revenue Code and which have on file with the Department of Revenue a tax exemption letter issued by the United States Internal Revenue Service. (b)  The department shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the taking of oysters by the nonprofit organization and shall issue such regulations to all organizations upon request and at the issuance of the special permit. (5)  The department shall establish a reasonable period of time for depuration of oysters replanted from restricted waters.  That period of time shall be consistent with the maintenance of the public health and may vary from time to time and from one reef to another in accordance with environmental conditions. SECTION 18.  Section 49-15-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-37.  The department may employ boats, crews and laborers to cultivate the state-owned reefs of the state, and dredge the oysters in the Mississippi Sound from places where they are too thick, and spread them on reefs where they are too thin, and carry shells from the factories and spread them in places where the oyster beds can be improved and enlarged.  The department may open state-owned reefs to the public for harvest.  The department may purchase other materials as may be equally suitable for the propagation of oysters.  The department in cultivating the reefs, transplanting and spreading oysters and shells and other suitable materials, may expend any funds available for that purpose, as provided by Section 49-15-17(1)(e).  In taking seed oysters, care shall be used to not injure or destroy the merchantable oysters on the reefs from which they are taken.  The seed oysters shall be tonged from the "conner" or seed reefs, unless it is practicable and safe to dredge those oysters.  The department may establish new bedding grounds at those places within the boundaries of the state as it may determine, on advice of the director, or on advice of technical governmental experts, or competent aquatic biologists.  On existing state-owned reefs in which oysters exist and in waters not of a safe sanitary quality as determined by the department, the department shall prohibit any person, firm or corporation from taking oysters from those areas.  The department shall from time to time remove the oysters from the areas and relay or replant them in an approved area for a period of time under Section 49-15-36 before they may be harvested.  Any funds received from the sale of the oysters shall be used in a like manner as those funds received under Section 49-15-17(1)(e). The department may issue permits to persons to remove oysters by dredging or otherwise from water bottoms which are not of a safe sanitary quality for oysters for human consumption. These areas may be designated as seed grounds, and permits to persons shall be issued only for the purpose of transplanting oysters to privately leased Mississippi territorial waters.  The department may permit the transplanting of these seed oysters by a duly authorized public agency. The department may, upon determining the water bottom from which oysters are to be removed is not of a safe, sanitary quality for oyster production for human consumption and has been unsafe for a period of at least one (1) year immediately preceding certification, and upon complying with the following requirements, permit the dredging of oysters from restricted public areas and relaying the oysters to private leased grounds in the State of Mississippi: (a)  Permittee must hold valid lease of oyster bedding grounds in the State of Mississippi; (b)  Permittee must be bonded in compliance with the permit system established by the department; (c)  Permittee must fulfill all permit requirements as established by the department; (d)  Permittee shall not move oysters from one restricted area to another restricted area; (e)  Permittee shall move oysters only to an area leased by the department; and (f)  Permittee shall not move oysters from the restricted area without the presence of an employee of the department at all times, from the dredging of the oysters from the restricted areas to their deposit on private leased grounds or to an onshore, molluscan depuration facility. Harvesting of oysters shall be permitted only during daylight hours and with the most efficient gear possible consistent with conservation requirements of not damaging the reefs. This shall include permission to use two (2) dredges per boat on restricted areas and on private leased grounds. Any person obtaining a permit to remove oysters from seed grounds shall post a penal bond of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per leased acre with the department to be forfeited upon any violation of this section.  The bond may be approved by the director of the department if the director finds the bond to be secured by sufficient property or sureties. The department shall regulate the amount and time of taking of oysters from seed areas and shall supervise the removal, planting and harvesting of oysters from the areas.  The time set for the taking of oysters from restricted seed areas for relaying or replanting and the time set for the taking of oysters from private leased grounds shall be separated by not less than a period of time determined under Section 49-15-36 during which neither activity may be allowed. SECTION 19.  Section 49-15-38, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-38.  (1)  (a)  Unless otherwise permitted by the department, no oysters shall be taken from state-owned reefs unless culled, and all oysters less than three (3) inches from end to end, and all dead shells, shall be replaced, scattered and broadcast immediately on the reefs from which they are taken.  It is unlawful for any captain or person in charge of any vessel, or any canner, packer, commission man, dealer or other person to purchase, sell or to have in that person's possession or under that person's control any oysters off the state-owned reefs or private bedding grounds not culled according to this section, or any oysters under the legal size.  A ten percent (10%) tolerance shall be allowed in relation to any culling. (b)  The department may authorize the culling of oysters of a lesser measure.  That authorization shall be in response to special circumstances or extreme natural conditions affecting the habitat, including, but not limited to, flooding.  The department may establish checkpoints in any area within its jurisdiction to conduct inspections, collect fees and issue tags in the enforcement of this chapter and regulations adopted by the commission. (2)  The department shall acquire and replant shells, seed oysters and other materials, when funding is available, for the purpose of growing oysters. (3)  Any person, firm or corporation failing or refusing to pay the shell retention fee required under Section 49-15-46 to the department when called for by the department, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each sack of shells for which they fail or refuse to tender the shell retention fee.  In addition to the fine, the violator shall pay the reasonable value of the oyster shells and shall be ineligible to be licensed for any activity set forth in this chapter for a period of two (2) years from the date of conviction. (4)  The planting of oyster shells as provided under this chapter shall be under the direction and supervision of the executive director of the department. SECTION 20.  Section 49-15-40, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-40.  The department may support projects in the nature of digging or constructing canals or ditches to bring additional water to existing oyster reefs or beds in need of that water, or for the purpose of creating or establishing new oyster reefs or beds.  The department may also enter into interstate or intrastate efforts to support these projects and may seek and utilize aid from all federal, state and local sources in this endeavor. SECTION 21.  Section 49-15-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-41.  It shall be unlawful for any person to fish, catch or take oysters from the waters of Mississippi during the hours between sunset and sunrise of each day. Violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year in the county jail, or both. SECTION 22.  Section 49-15-42, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-42.  (1)  All oysters caught in Mississippi territorial waters shall be tagged and unloaded in Mississippi.  Before tagging and unloading, the oysters must be sacked or packaged in containers or by other methods approved by the department. However, a person is exempt from the unloading requirement if he is transporting the oysters to a state that has a reciprocity agreement with Mississippi exempting Mississippi residents from the unloading requirements of that state. (2)  The driver of any vehicle used in the transporting of oysters in the shell from outside the territorial limits of the State of Mississippi, whether the vehicle is a boat or motor vehicle, shall possess an invoice, statement or other bill of lading which bears the name of the person, firm or corporation from whom the oysters were purchased, the name of the purchaser and the number of barrels or bushels of oysters which the vehicle or vessel contains. SECTION 23.  Section 49-15-43, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-43.  Oysters for sale either wholesale or retail may be packaged in glass jars covered with a screw-type top or lid of the type customarily and heretofore used in the seafood industry in the State of Mississippi, but this section shall automatically be repealed if and when such type packaging becomes prohibited by any agency of the United States Government for shipment in interstate commerce. SECTION 24.  Section 49-15-44, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-44.  The department shall prohibit the sale or possession of illegal oysters.  It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to possess or to engage in the sale of oysters not certified in this state, or to shuck or repack for sale any illegal oysters, unless that person, firm or corporation possesses a bill of sale, valid permit or affidavit of another state, properly dated, evidencing the legality of the sale or possession of the oysters in that state.  Any person in possession of illegal oysters shall be subject to civil or criminal prosecution and shall be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or punished as provided in Section 49-15-63. SECTION 25.  Section 49-15-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-45.  Any municipality bounded by the Gulf of Mexico or Mississippi Sound, which has wholly or partly within its corporate limits, or in the waters adjacent thereto, a public oyster reef reserved for catching oysters exclusively by use of hand tongs, is hereby authorized to aid and cooperate with the department in enforcing all laws regulating the catching, taking and transporting of oysters, including all of the provisions of this chapter, and all regulations and ordinances of such department relating to such oyster reefs. SECTION 26.  Section 49-15-46, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-46.  (1)  Each vessel used to catch, take, carry or transport oysters from the reefs of the State of Mississippi, or engaged in transporting any oysters in any of the waters within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi, for commercial use, shall annually, before beginning operations, be licensed by the department and pay the following license fee: (a)  Fifty Dollars ($50.00) on each in-state vessel or boat used for tonging oysters or gathering oysters by hand; (b)  One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) on each in-state vessel or boat used for dredging oysters; (c)  One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) on each out-of-state vessel or boat used for tonging oysters or gathering oysters by hand, or the license fee charged by the out-of-state licensing entity to Mississippi vessels or boats for tonging or gathering oysters, whichever is greater; or (d)  Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) on each out-of-state vessel or boat used for dredging oysters, or the license fee charged by the out-of-state licensing entity to Mississippi vessels or boats for dredging oysters, whichever is greater. (2)  Each molluscan shellfish aquaculture operation shall annually, before beginning operations, be licensed by the department and pay the following license fee: (a)  Fifty Dollars ($50.00) on each resident molluscan shellfish aquaculture operation; or (b)  One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) on each nonresident molluscan shellfish aquaculture operation. (3)  The department may authorize the transfer of a vessel license to a different vessel provided that the owner of both vessels is the same titled owner. (4)  All oysters harvested in the State of Mississippi shall be tagged.  Tags may be issued by the department or printed by the catcher in compliance with procedures and regulations adopted by the department.  Such tags shall bear the catcher's name, the date and origin of the catch, the shell stock dealer's name and permit number.  The department shall number all tags issued and shall maintain a record of those tags.  The department, in its discretion, may adopt any regulations regarding the tagging of oysters and other shellfish. (5)  Each person catching or taking oysters from the waters of the State of Mississippi for personal use shall obtain a permit from the department and pay an annual recreational oyster permit fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00).  Oysters caught under a recreational permit shall not be offered for sale.  The limits on the allowable catch of oysters for recreational purposes shall be three (3) sacks per week.  The department shall issue tags of a distinguishing color to designate recreationally harvested oysters, which shall be tagged on the same day of harvest in the manner prescribed in subsection (4) of this section for commercially harvested oysters or by regulation of the department. (6)  The department shall assess and collect a shell retention fee for the shells taken from waters within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi as follows: (a)  Commercial and recreational harvesters - Fifteen Cents (15¢) per sack paid to the department on the day of harvest; (b)  Initial oyster processor, dealer or factory first purchasing the oysters - Fifteen Cents (15¢) per sack paid to the department no later than the tenth day of the month following the purchase, on forms submitted by the department; (c)  Commercial harvesters transporting their catch out of the state - Fifty Cents (50¢) per sack paid to the department on the day of harvest, in addition to the fees paid in paragraph (a) of this subsection; and (d)  Commercial harvesters not selling their oysters to a Mississippi dealer - Fifteen Cents (15¢) per sack paid to the department on the day of harvest, in addition to fees paid in paragraph (a) of this subsection. Funds received from the shell retention fee shall be paid into the Oyster Production Preserve Account within the Seafood Fund pursuant to Section 49-15-17(1)(e) for use by the department to further oyster production in this state, which includes plantings of oysters and/or cultch materials. (7)  During open seasons, oysters may be taken only by hands, tongs and dredges. (8)  Vessels licensed under Section 49-15-46 may keep in whole, for personal consumption up to thirty-six (36) blue crabs (portunidae family), per day.  This exemption for personal consumption does not apply to fish or crabs that are otherwise illegal to possess or catch. SECTION 27.  Section 49-15-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-47.  (1)  It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to discharge solid or human waste from any vessel while the vessel is used to harvest or transport oysters in the marine waters of the state. (2)  Each vessel used to harvest or transport oysters is required to have an approved functional marine sanitation device (MSD), portable toilet or other sewage disposal receptacle designed to contain human sewage.  The approved marine sanitation device (MSD), portable toilet or other sewage disposal receptacle shall: (a)  Be used only for the purpose intended. (b)  Be secured while on board and located to prevent contamination of shell stock by spillage or leakage. (c)  Be emptied only into an approved sewage disposal system. (d)  Be cleaned before being returned to the vessel. (e)  Not be cleaned with equipment used for washing or processing food. (3)  The use of other receptacles for sewage disposal may be approved by the department if the receptacles are: (a)  Constructed of impervious, cleanable materials and have tight-fitting lids; and (b)  Meet the requirements listed in subsection (2). (4)  Any person, firm or corporation violating the provisions of this chapter, shall, on conviction, be fined not less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), and the license of the convicted party shall be revoked for one (1) year.  For conviction of a second offense, the fine shall be not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), and the license of the convicted party shall be revoked for two (2) years.  For a conviction of a third offense, the fine shall be not less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), and the license of the convicted party shall be permanently revoked. (5)  Upon issuance of a citation for a violation of this section, the vessel shall be removed from the oyster reef and any oysters on board the vessel shall be confiscated and disposed of by the department.  The vessel shall not be permitted to harvest from any state-owned or private reefs until the vessel is properly equipped as determined by an inspection by the department. SECTION 28.  Section 49-15-315, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-315.  (1)  It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to engage in commercial harvesting of crabs, oysters, shrimp, bait shrimp or saltwater fish in the marine waters north of the CSX bridge in the three (3) coastal counties, except for the following: (a)  A person may take any euryhaline species of minnow; and (b)  A licensed commercial oyster fisherman may harvest oysters from reefs approved by the commission. (2)  The Gulf Coast Research Laboratory shall study all estuaries and bays deemed to be nurseries.  The Gulf Coast Research Laboratory may recommend the establishment of nursery grounds in the estuaries and bays if necessary to protect the state's fishing resources. (3)  The department shall set the limits on all catches for noncommercial use. (4)  A person, firm or corporation found guilty of violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined as provided in Section 49-15-100(2), or imprisoned not more than three (3) months or both; and in addition, the commission shall seize and confiscate all commercial nets, trawls, traps, tongs and boats used for such purpose and dispose of it at public sale and shall deposit the proceeds to the credit of the Seafood Fund.  If the person in possession of or using the nets in the violation is not the owner or licensee of the nets, the department shall notify the owner or licensee of the nets.  The nets shall be subject to forfeiture unless the nets were stolen and prosecution for the theft is initiated. SECTION 29.  Section 51-11-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 51-11-105.  The following provisions related to the Lower Pearl River Restoration Project ("project") are contingent upon the development of an agreement, or an amendment to the existing agreement, between the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality ("MDEQ"), the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks ("DWFP") and the district, removing the district from the agreement, and possibly adding a new cooperating partner or partners and possibly removing the MDEQ and/or the DWFP from the agreement. From and after July 1, 2018, the project, currently being managed as a joint effort of the MDEQ, the DWFP, and the district, shall continue as per existing agreements, which may be amended to reflect the dissolution of the district and its removal from those agreements.  The obligations of the district under the current agreements for the project may be assumed by the MDEQ, or other entity, as the designated state entity for the continuing obligation of maintenance of the water control structures as set forth in the original agreements.  The parties to the agreement may identify necessary maintenance activities needed to preserve the integrity of project structures and other ordinary maintenance activities as the parties may agree need to be performed.  Funding to perform those maintenance activities shall come from the Lower Pearl trust account currently on deposit with a depository or depositories in the name of the Pearl River Basin Development District, which funds are a special fund set aside solely for the operation and maintenance of the project.  From and after July 1, 2018, the parties to the agreement, may assume ownership, in trust, of those funds, and the funds shall be known as the "Lower Pearl River Restoration Trust Fund."  Monies from this fund shall be a special fund set aside for the purpose(s) set forth in the amended or reformed agreement between the parties and shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and may not be expended for any purpose other than operation and maintenance activities under the purview of the project. SECTION 30.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.